Alaska, session 34, HB79.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 06 to read: 07 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of 08 Alaska not spend funds on signage or materials exclusively to update the name of the Vic 09 Fischer Institute of Social and Economic Research. 10 * Sec. 2. AS 14.40.110 is amended to read: 11 Sec. 14.40.110. Establishment of Business, Economics, and Public 12 Administration Research Program. The University of Alaska may establish a 13 Business, Economics, and Public Administration Research Program, which shall be 14 named the Vic Fischer Institute of Social and Economic Research, for the purpose 01 of developing and publishing statistics and other information regarding the economy, 02 government, and resources of the state. 03 * Sec. 3. AS 41.21.304 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (b) The marine park unit of the Alaska state park system designated in (a)(4) 05 of this section is named Vic Fischer Shoup Bay State Marine Park. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.